Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,207
Reimbursement of costs.

The Department of Labor shall reimburse the Department of Revenue and the Department of Administrative Services for all reasonable and necessary costs incurred in setting off debts pursuant to sections 77-27,197 to 77-27,209.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 11.